Connecticut, session 2026, HB05194.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
three hundred thousand dollars, in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of Education for
the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the New England Science and
Sailing Foundation to ensure its facilities are compliant with physical
accessibility guidelines under the federal Americans with Disabilities
Act.